Utah statutes.
31A-29-119.   Benefit reduction.

(1)  The pool shall be the last payer of benefits whenever any other benefit is available.

(2)  Benefits otherwise payable under pool coverage shall be reduced by:

(a)  all amounts paid or payable through any other health benefit plan or any limited health benefit plan, including a self-insured plan;

(b)  all hospital and medical expense benefits paid or payable under any workers' compensation coverage, automobile medical payment, or liability insurance, whether provided on the basis of fault or no-fault; and

(c)  any hospital or medical benefits paid or payable under or provided pursuant to any state or federal law program.

(3)  The board shall have a cause of action against an enrollee for the recovery of the amount of benefits paid which are not for covered expenses.  Benefits due from the pool may be reduced or refused as a set-off against any amount recoverable under this Subsection (3).

